tests/morphophonology/final-i.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] й+е > е":
    музей<n><px3sp><nom> : музее

  "[twol] и+е > ие":
    поши<n><px3sp><nom> : пошие
    тарихи<n><px3sp><nom> : тарихие
    тарихи<n><px3sp><nom> : тарихисы
    бриджи<n><px3sp><nom> : бриджие
    бриджи<n><px3sp><nom> : бриджисы
    гади<n><px3sp><nom> : гадие
    песи<n><px3sp><nom> : песие
    ралли<n><px3sp><nom> : раллие
    ралли<n><px3sp><nom> : раллисы
    ки<v><tv><gna_perf> : киеп
    абый<n><px3sp><nom> : абые
    абый<n><px3sp><nom> : абыйсы
    сеңел<n><px3pl><nom> : сеңелебез
    сеңел<n><px3sp><nom> : сеңлесе
    зур<adj><subst><px3sp><nom> : зурысы

  "[twol] е+е > се/сы":  
    ателье<n><px3sp><nom> : ательесы
    декольте<n><px3sp><nom> : декольтесы
